Utah statutes.
11-30-3.   Petition to establish validity of bonds -- Contents -- Court
action.
(1)  A public body may, at any time after it has authorized the issuance of
bonds for other than a project financing involving more than one series of
bonds to finance such project or at any time after it has authorized the
issuance of the first series of bonds to finance a project in more than one
series, but before the issuance and delivery of any such bonds or such first
series of bonds, as the case may be, file a petition to establish the validity
of such bonds.
(2)  The petition shall be filed in the district court of the county in which
the public body maintains its principal office, and shall name as defendants
all taxpayers, property owners, citizens of the public body, including
nonresidents owning property or subject to taxation therein, all other persons
having or claiming any right, title, or interest in any property or funds
affected by or to be affected by the bonds, all parties to any contract or
instrument which is part of the validation proceedings, and, pursuant to
Section 11-30-6, either the attorney general or the county attorney of the
county in which the largest expenditure of proceeds of the bonds is expected
to be made.
(3)  The petition shall set forth and affirm, by proper allegation of law and
fact:
(a)  the statutory authority by which the petition is filed;
(b)  the statutory authority by which the public body authorized the issuance
of the bonds;
(c)  the ordinance, resolution, or other proceedings by which the public body
authorized the issuance and delivery of the bonds;
(d)  the holding of an election and the results of that election, if an
election was required;
(e)  the purpose of the bonds; and
(f)  the source of funds from which the bonds are to be paid.
(4)  The petitioner may set forth any additional information with respect to
such bonds and any questions of law or fact concerning the validity of the
bonds that the petitioner desires the court to adjudicate separately in
rendering its judgment, as well as those allegations of law or fact necessary
to its consideration.
(5)  The petitioner shall then petition the court to render judgment affirming
the validity of the bonds and to pass upon any questions for separate
adjudication set forth in the petition.  Any petitioner may amend or
supplement the petition at any time on or before the hearing, but not
thereafter without permission of the court.
(6)  No amendment or supplement may require republication of the order unless
there has been a change in the issuer or there has been a substantial change
in the use of the proceeds or the manner of repayment of the bonds.
